Utah statutes.
34-28-14.   Actions by division as assignee -- Costs need not be advanced.

(1)  In all actions brought by the division as assignee under Section 34-28-13, no court costs of any nature shall be required to be advanced nor shall any bond or other security be required from the division in connection with the same.

(2)  Any sheriff, constable, or other officer requested by the division to serve summons, writs, complaints, orders, including any garnishment papers, and all necessary and legal papers within his jurisdiction shall do so without requiring the division to advance the fees or furnish any security or bond.

(3)  Whenever the division shall require the sheriff, constable, or other officer whose duty it is to seize property or levy thereon in any attachment proceedings to satisfy any wage claim judgment to perform any such duty, this officer shall do so without requiring the division to furnish any security or bond in the action.

(4)  The officer in carrying out the provisions of this Subsection (4) is not responsible in damages for any wrongful seizure made in good faith.

(5)  Whenever anyone other than the defendant claims the right of possession or ownership to such seized property, then in such case the officer may permit such claimant to have the custody of such property pending a determination of the court as to who has right of possession or ownership of such property.

(6)  Any garnishee defendant shall be required to appear and make answer in any such action, as required by law, without having paid to the garnishee defendant in advance witness fees, but such witness fees shall be included as part of the taxable costs of such action.  Out of any recovery on a judgment in such a suit, there shall be paid the following: first, the witness fees to the garnishee defendant; second, the wage claims involved; third, the sheriff's or constable's fees; and fourth, the court costs.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

